Massachusetts, session 194th, H2355.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 14 of chapter 40 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the town of Northfield is hereby authorizing to acquire, by
gift, purchase, eminent domain or otherwise, property located in the town of Bernardston, for
general municipal purpose, including for a public safety facility, said property being a parcel of
land, containing 3.018 acres, more or less, with the improvements thereon, known as 546
Northfield Road (Route 10), Bernardston, described in a deed recorded with the Franklin County
Registry of Deeds in Book 6209, Page 62, shown as “Lot 2” on a plan entitled “Plan of Land in
Bernardston, MA Surveyed for Country Oil, Inc” dated August 15, 2001, recorded with the
Registry in Plan Book 114, Page 43.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1